Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1314
Title or abbreviation; use; when.

Only a person who holds a valid current certificate for use in this state shall have the right and privilege of using the title Registered Environmental Health Specialist and to use the abbreviation R.E.H.S. after his or her name.

Laws 1963, c. 400, § 13, p. 1285;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 48;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3713;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 535.